Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6.3 Bonus Program

40-6.3-1.
Bonus program.

The director of human services (hereinafter referred to as the “director”) shall implement a cash bonus program for one year for welfare recipients who have been receiving aid to families with dependent children (AFDC) for a period of at least thirty (30) consecutive months next prior to the effective date of this chapter. The recipients agree to forego all welfare benefits of whatever nature and return to full-time employment, except any medical assistance coverage in conformity with rules and regulations promulgated by the director. The program shall be limited to the first one hundred (100) recipients who choose to participate and are otherwise qualified. Applications for the bonus program will be accepted commencing thirty (30) days after the start of the state’s fiscal year and terminating ninety (90) days after the start of the state’s fiscal year or as soon as the first one hundred (100) recipients have been qualified for acceptance into the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 247, § 1.

40-6.3-2.
Disbursement of bonus.

The director is hereby authorized to approve a maximum bonus for each qualified recipient in the sum of three thousand dollars ($3,000). The amount shall be distributed as follows:

After the recipient completes three (3) months of continuous, full-time employment, the director shall distribute to each recipient the sum of five hundred dollars ($500);

After the recipient completes six (6) months of continuous, full-time employment, the director shall distribute to each recipient the additional sum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750);

After the recipient completes nine (9) months of continuous, full-time employment, the director shall distribute to each recipient the additional sum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and

After the recipient completes twelve (12) months of continuous, full-time employment, the director shall distribute to each recipient the additional sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

In the event any recipient becomes unemployed at any time during the program, the recipient shall forfeit receipt of any incremental payment of a bonus not fully earned at the time of unemployment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 247, § 1.

40-6.3-3.
Initial training and work experience.

A participant in this program shall be required to participate in an eight-week (8) period of training and work experience. The period shall not be included when determining the time of disbursement as set forth in §

40-6.3-2

. The training and work experience period may be “on-the-job” training conducted by the employer or other training and work experience as authorized by the director. A participant in this program shall be paid, at the least, the state minimum wage during the eight-week (8) period of training and work experience.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 247, § 1.

40-6.3-4.
Private participation.

Any employer who participates in this program shall be entitled to a two hundred fifty dollar ($250) tax credit per participant when a participant has worked twenty-four (24) consecutive months for the employer. The eight-week (8) period of training and work experience set forth in §

40-6.3-3

shall not count when determining the twenty-four (24) consecutive months.

During the eight-week (8) training and work-experience period, the state shall subsidize the employer for wages earned by the participant. The rate of subsidy shall not exceed the state minimum wage.

The employer shall, as soon as possible, place the participant on any medical plan or insurance provided by the employer to any other employee at the same or similar level.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 247, § 1.

40-6.3-5.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to determine the qualifications for the recipients to participate in this pilot program; for determining the standards relating to “continuous employment”; for determining the conditions terminating participation resulting from a recipient’s unemployment; for subsidizing the wage of participants; for determining the type of eight-week (8) period of training and work experience; for transitional medical assistance; and to otherwise effectuate this bonus program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 247, § 1.

40-6.3-6.
Appropriation.

There is hereby appropriated the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to carry out the purpose of this chapter, and the state controller is hereby directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much thereof as may be required, from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of vouchers duly authenticated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 247, § 1.